West Virginia, session 2026, SB900.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of West Virginia: ARTICLE 16. USE OF UNMANNED AIRCRAFT SYSTEMS. §61-16-1. Definitions. As used in this article:(1) "Aircraft" means any device now known or subsequently invented, used, or designed for flight in the air, including, but not limited to, unmanned aerial vehicles;(2) "Targeted facility" means a critical infrastructure facility, as defined in § 61-10-34 of this Code, and shall also include any jail, state correctional facility, juvenile detention center, or federal correctional facility.(3) "Unmanned aerial vehicles" means an aircraft that is operated without direct human intervention from inside or on the aircraft and includes the crewmember, the associated support equipment, the control station, data links, telemetry, communications, and navigation equipment necessary to operate the unmanned aircraft, including, but not limited to, drones;(4) "Unmanned aerial vehicle operator" or "operator" means a person exercising control over an unmanned aerial vehicle during flight.